Utah statutes.
10-2-301.   Classification of municipalities according to population.
(1)  Each municipality shall be classified according to its population, as
provided in this section.
(2) (a)  A municipality with a population of 100,000 or more is a city of the
first class.
(b)  A municipality with a population of 65,000 or more but less than 100,000
is a city of the second class.
(c)  A municipality with a population of 30,000 or more but less than 65,000
is a city of the third class.
(d)  A municipality with a population of 10,000 or more but less than 30,000
is a city of the fourth class.
(e)  A municipality with a population of 1,000 or more but less than 10,000 is
a city of the fifth class.
(f)  A municipality with a population under 1,000 is a town.
